Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 12. Tobacco Settlement Funds

Severability. —

Laws 2004, ch. 37, § 2, provides: “If this act, or any portion of the amendment to W.S. 9-4-1202(b)(ii) made by this act, is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional, then this act shall be deemed repealed, and W.S. 9-4-1202(b)(ii) restored as if no such amendments had been made. Neither any holding of unconstitutionality nor the repeal of this act's amendments to W.S. 9-4-1202(b)(ii) shall affect, impair or invalidate any other portion of W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1210

, or the application of such section to any other person or circumstance, and such remaining portions of W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1210

shall at all times continue in full force and effect.”

§ 9-4-1201.
Definitions.

As used in this act:

“Adjusted for inflation” means increased in accordance with the formula for inflation adjustment set forth in Exhibit C to the master settlement agreement;

“Affiliate” means a person who directly or indirectly owns or controls, is owned or controlled by, or is under common ownership or control with, another person. Solely for purposes of this definition, the terms “owns”, “is owned” and “ownership” mean ownership of an equity interest, or the equivalent thereof, of ten percent (10%) or more, and the term “person” means an individual, partnership, committee, association, corporation or any other organization or group of persons;

“Allocable share” means allocable share as that term is defined in the master settlement agreement;

“Cigarette” means any product that contains nicotine, is intended to be burned or heated under ordinary conditions of use, and consists of or contains:

Any roll of tobacco wrapped in paper or in any substance not containing tobacco;

Tobacco, in any form, that is functional in the product, which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette; or

Any roll of tobacco wrapped in any substance containing tobacco which, because of its appearance, the type of tobacco used in the filler, or its packaging and labeling, is likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as a cigarette described in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The term “cigarette” includes “roll-your-own” (i.e., any tobacco which, because of its appearance, type, packaging, or labeling is suitable for use and likely to be offered to, or purchased by, consumers as tobacco for making cigarettes). For purposes of this definition of “cigarette”, nine one-hundredths (.09) ounces of “roll-your-own” tobacco shall constitute one (1) individual “cigarette”.

“Master settlement agreement” means the settlement agreement (and related documents) entered into on November 23, 1998 by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers;

“Qualified escrow fund” means an escrow arrangement with a federally or state chartered financial institution having no affiliation with any tobacco product manufacturer and having assets of at least one billion dollars ($1,000,000,000.00) where such arrangement requires that such financial institution hold the escrowed funds’ principal for the benefit of releasing parties and prohibits the tobacco product manufacturer placing the funds into escrow from using, accessing or directing the use of the funds’ principal except as consistent with W.S. 9-4-1202(b);

“Released claims” means released claims as that term is defined in the master settlement agreement;

“Releasing parties” means releasing parties as that term is defined in the master settlement agreement;

“Tobacco product manufacturer” means, but shall not include an affiliate of a tobacco product manufacturer unless such affiliate itself falls within any of subparagraphs (A) through (C) of this paragraph, an entity that after the date of enactment of this act directly (and not exclusively through any affiliate):

Manufactures cigarettes anywhere that such manufacturer intends to be sold in the United States, including cigarettes intended to be sold in the United States through an importer (except where such importer is an original participating manufacturer, as that term is defined in the master settlement agreement, that will be responsible for the payments under the master settlement, agreement with respect to such cigarettes as a result of the provisions of subsection II(mm) of the master settlement agreement and that pays the taxes specified in subsection II(z) of the master settlement agreement, and provided that the manufacturer of such cigarettes does not market or advertise such cigarettes in the United States);

Is the first purchaser anywhere for resale in the United States of cigarettes manufactured anywhere that the manufacturer does not intend to be sold in the United States; or

Becomes a successor of an entity described in subparagraph (A) or (B) of this paragraph.

“Units sold” means the number of individual cigarettes sold in the state by the applicable tobacco product manufacturer (whether directly or through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary or intermediaries) during the year in question, as measured by excise taxes collected by the state on packs of cigarettes or “roll-your-own” tobacco containers. The department of revenue shall promulgate such regulations as are necessary to ascertain the amount of state excise tax paid on the cigarettes of such tobacco product manufacturer for each year;

“This act” means W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1204

.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 52, § 1; 2004, ch. 37, § 1; ch. 130, § 1.

The 2004 amendments. —

The first 2004 amendment, by ch. 37, § 1, in (a)(x), in the first sentence, inserted “of cigarettes” following “by the state on packs,” and deleted “bearing the excise tax stamp of the state” at the end, and made stylistic changes.

Laws 2004, ch. 37, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The second 2004 amendment, by ch. 130, § 1, in (a)(xi), substituted “through

9-4-1204

” for “and

9-4-1202

.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

See conflicting legislation note below. This section has been set out incorporating changes made by both 2004 acts.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Am Jur 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity, construction, application, and effect of master settlement agreement (msa) between tobacco companies and various states, and state statutes implementing agreement; use and distribution of msa proceeds. 25 A.L.R.6th 435.

§ 9-4-1202.
Requirements.

Any tobacco product manufacturer selling cigarettes to consumers within the state, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary or intermediaries, after the date of enactment of this act shall do one (1) of the following:

Become a participating manufacturer, as that term is defined in section II(jj) of the master settlement agreement, and generally perform its financial obligations under the master settlement agreement; or

Place into a qualified escrow fund by April 15 of the year following the year in question the following amounts, as such amounts are adjusted for inflation:

In 2000, $.0104712 per unit sold after the effective date of this act;

For each of 2001 and 2002, $.0136125 per unit sold;

For each of 2003 through 2006, $.0167539 per unit sold;

For each of 2007 and each year thereafter, $.0188482 per unit sold.

A tobacco product manufacturer that places funds into escrow pursuant to paragraph (a)(ii) of this section shall receive the interest or other appreciation on such funds as earned. Such funds themselves shall be released from escrow only under the following circumstances:

To pay a judgment or settlement on any released claim brought against such tobacco product manufacturer by the state or any releasing party located or residing in the state. Funds shall be released from escrow under this paragraph:

In the order in which they were placed into escrow; and

Only to the extent and at the time necessary to make payments required under such judgment or settlement.

To the extent that a tobacco product manufacturer establishes that the amount it was required to place into escrow on account of units sold in the state in a particular year was greater than the master settlement agreement payments, as determined pursuant to section IX(i) of that agreement including after final determination of all adjustments, that such manufacturer would have been required to make on account of such units sold had it been a participating manufacturer, the excess shall be released from escrow and revert back to such tobacco product manufacturer; or

To the extent not released from escrow under paragraph (i) or (ii) of this subsection, funds shall be released from escrow and revert back to such tobacco product manufacturer twenty-five (25) years after the date on which they were placed into escrow.

Each tobacco product manufacturer that elects to place funds into escrow pursuant to this section shall annually certify to the attorney general that it is in compliance with this section. The attorney general may bring a civil action on behalf of the state against any tobacco product manufacturer that fails to place into escrow the funds required under this section. Any tobacco product manufacturer that fails in any year to place into escrow the funds required under this section shall:

Be required within fifteen (15) days to place such funds into escrow as shall bring it into compliance with this section. The court, upon a finding of a violation of this subsection, may impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed five percent (5%) of the amount improperly withheld from escrow per day of the violation and in a total amount not to exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the original amount improperly withheld from escrow;

In the case of a knowing violation, be required within fifteen (15) days to place such funds into escrow as shall bring it into compliance with this section. The court, upon a finding of a knowing violation of this subsection, may impose a civil penalty in an amount not to exceed fifteen percent (15%) of the amount improperly withheld from escrow per day of the violation and in a total amount not to exceed three hundred percent (300%) of the original amount improperly withheld from escrow; and

In the case of a second knowing violation, be prohibited from selling cigarettes to consumers within the state, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary, for a period not to exceed two (2) years.

Each failure to make an annual deposit required under this section shall constitute a separate violation.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 52, § 1; 2004, ch. 37, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

rewrote (b)(ii), modifying provisions for the release of escrowed funds.

Laws 2004, ch. 37, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

The 2005 amendment

in (b)(ii), substituted “IX(i)” for “IX(I).”

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-1201(a)(xi).

Editor's notes. —

For the definition “master settlement agreement,” see § 9-6-1201(a)(v).

Constitutionality of amendment by Laws 2004. —

Laws 2004, ch. 37, § 2, provides: “If this act, or any portion of the amendment to W.S. 9-4-1202(b)(ii) made by this act, is held by a court of competent jurisdiction to be unconstitutional, then this act shall be deemed repealed, and W.S. 9-4-1202(b)(ii) restored as if no such amendments had been made. Neither any holding of unconstitutionality nor the repeal of this act's amendments to W.S. 9-4-1202(b)(ii) shall affect, impair or invalidate any other portion of W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1210

, or the application of such section to any other person or circumstance, and such remaining portions of W.S.

9-4-1201

through

9-4-1210

shall at all times continue in full force and effect.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-4-1203.
Tobacco settlement trust fund established; corpus inviolate; investment by state treasurer.

The Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund is created. The Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund shall consist of:

All funds received by the state of Wyoming prior to March 15, 2002 as financial recovery under the terms of the master settlement agreement regarding litigation between several states and major tobacco manufacturers, which settlement agreement was approved by the state of Wyoming in November 1998; and

Any other funds appropriated or designated to the fund by law or by gift from whatever source.

Funds deposited into the Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund established pursuant to subsection (a) of this section are intended to be inviolate and constitute a permanent or perpetual trust fund which shall be invested by the state treasurer as authorized by law and in a manner to obtain the highest net return possible consistent with preservation of the corpus. Any earnings from investment of the corpus of the trust fund and all funds received by the state of Wyoming on or after March 15, 2002 as financial recovery under the terms of the master settlement agreement specified in paragraph (a)(i) of this section shall be credited by the state treasurer into a separate income account.

Revenues deposited into the income account established under subsection (b) shall be expended:

Only for purposes related to the improvement of the health of Wyoming’s citizens including:

Efforts in prevention and cessation of tobacco use through school and community based programs; and

Efforts to establish and implement programs to prevent, intervene in, and otherwise limit alcohol and substance abuse; and

Only upon appropriation by the legislature.

Funds not otherwise appropriated, expended or obligated as provided in subsection (c) of this section shall be transferred to the Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund on July 1 of each year following the receipt of those funds.

History.

Laws 1999, ch. 142, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-120

; Laws 2000, ch. 52, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 81, § 2; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2021 ch. 108, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the first sentence in (a), deleting the reference to the trust and agency fund, and in (a)(ii) substituted “fund” for “account”; substituted “a separate income account” for “a separate trust fund income account within the earmarked revenue fund” in (b); deleted “trust fund” preceding “income account” in (c); and inserted “Wyoming” in (d).

The 2021 amendment,

effective July 1, 2021, added "net" following "highest" in the first sentence of (b).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-1204.
Tobacco settlement funds; reduction of tobacco use.

Using a science and experience based approach, the department of health shall develop and implement comprehensive tobacco prevention, cessation and treatment programs for Wyoming. These programs shall include peer reviewed science based educational materials on tobacco harm reduction and the comparative risks of alternative nicotine products, vapor products, smokeless tobacco products, cigarettes and other combustible tobacco products. The program should be tailored to provide the most cost effective reduction of tobacco related problems based on available funds for each year.

The department may contract with a third party to develop and implement any part of the program authorized by subsection (a) of this section. Any contract awarded under this subsection shall be awarded on the basis of competitive bids and shall include specific requirements relating to outcome-based evaluations.

The department may solicit proposals for grants under this section by publication of a request for proposals. Grant recipients under this section may include local governments, community-based organizations, schools and other organizations as appropriate. Any request for proposal used during the competitive grant process shall include specific requirements relating to outcome-based evaluation of the grant recipient’s performance.

The department shall make every reasonable effort to collaborate and coordinate with other entities of state and local governments and other organizations to assure maximum leveraging of resources, including people and money. The department shall coordinate with those responsible for controlling the abuse of alcohol and other substances, juvenile delinquency and violence.

The department shall give priority to the following programs in regard to tobacco use in the state:

Comprehensive community based programs;

Public education, including use of media campaigns;

Youth involvement programs;

School and early childhood programs;

Enforcement of laws related to access to tobacco products by minors;

Programs to promote the cessation of tobacco use;

Programs for the treatment of tobacco related diseases.

Any monies appropriated to the department under subsection (g) of this section, after implementing subsections (a) through (e) of this section, shall be used to resolve other health issues of the people of the state of Wyoming.

Subject to appropriation by the legislature, the department shall use funds from the income account established under W.S. 9-4-1203(b) to implement the purposes of this section.

The department shall adopt reasonable rules and regulations in accordance with the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act to assure a long-range program to accomplish a healthier citizenry.

Repealed by Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 2.

As used in this section:

“Alternative nicotine product” means any noncombustible product containing nicotine that is intended for human consumption, whether chewed, absorbed, dissolved or ingested by any other means. “Alternative nicotine product,” does not include any vapor product, tobacco product, cigarettes, smokeless tobacco product or any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under subchapter V of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act;

“Smokeless tobacco product” means any tobacco product that consists of cut, ground, powdered or leaf tobacco that is intended to be placed in the oral or nasal cavity;

“Tobacco product” means any product that contains tobacco and is intended for human consumption, but not including an alternative nicotine product or vapor product;

“Vapor product” means any noncombustible product containing nicotine that employs a heating element, power source, electronic circuit or other electronic, chemical or mechanical means, regardless of shape or size, that can be used to produce vapor from nicotine in a solution or other form. “Vapor product” includes any electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe or similar product or device including any vapor cartridge or other container of nicotine in a solution or other form that is intended to be used with or in an electronic cigarette, electronic cigar, electronic cigarillo, electronic pipe or similar product or device. “Vapor product” does not include any product regulated as a drug or device by the United States food and drug administration under subchapter V of the Food, Drug and Cosmetic Act.

History.

Laws 2000, ch. 78, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective February 26, 2015; 2015 ch. 143, § 2, effective July 1, 2015.

Cross references. —

As to minor's consent to health care treatment for tobacco cessation, see 14-1-101(b)(vi).

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, deleted “trust fund” preceding “income account” in (g); and deleted “Wyoming tobacco settlement trust fund” preceding “income account” in (j).

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, by ch. 59, § 2, repealed former (j), which read: “The department shall report its activities under this section including the authorized expenditures of any money from the income account created by W.S.

9-4-1203

to the governor and the joint labor, health and social services interim committee not later than October 1 of each year.”

The second 2015 amendment, by ch. 143, § 2, effective July 1, 2015, in (a), inserted the present second sentence, and deleted “During the initial years” at the beginning of the present last sentence; added (k); and made related changes.

Laws 2015, ch. 59, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2000, ch. 78, § 1, enacted this section as §

9-2-121

. The section is set out above as renumbered by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office, pursuant to W.S.

8-1-105

. Internal references have been redesignated as well to correspond to the renumbering of §

9-2-120

to §

9-4-1203

by Laws 2000, ch. 52, § 2.

There is no subsection (i) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Wyoming Administrative Procedures Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 9-4-1205.
Certifications; directory; tax stamps.

Every tobacco product manufacturer whose cigarettes are sold in this state, whether directly or through a distributor, retailer or similar intermediary, shall annually execute and deliver on a form prescribed by the attorney general a certification to the department and the attorney general no later than April 30 of each year, certifying under penalty of false swearing that, as of the date of the certification, the tobacco manufacturer either is a participating manufacturer or is otherwise in full compliance with this act and W.S.

9-4-1202

.

A participating manufacturer shall include a complete list of its brand families in its certification under this section. The participating manufacturer shall update its list thirty (30) days prior to any addition to, or modification of, its brand families by executing and delivering a supplemental certification to the department and the attorney general.

In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer:

The certification shall include a complete list of its brand families:

Separately listing its brand families of cigarettes and the number of units sold for each brand family that were sold in the state during the preceding calendar year;

That have been sold in the state at any time during the current calendar year;

Indicating by an asterisk, any brand family sold in the state during the preceding calendar year that is no longer being sold in the state as of the date of the certification; and

Identifying by name and address any other manufacturer of the brand families in the preceding or current calendar year.

The certification shall further certify:

That the nonparticipating manufacturer is registered to do business in the state or has appointed a resident agent in the state for service of process and has provided notice with respect to the appointment of an agent as required by W.S. 9-4-1206(b);

That the nonparticipating manufacturer has established and continues to maintain a qualified escrow fund and has executed a qualified escrow agreement that has been reviewed and approved by the attorney general and that governs the qualified escrow fund;

That the nonparticipating manufacturer is in full compliance with W.S.

9-4-1202

, this act and any regulations promulgated thereto;

The name, address and telephone number of the financial institution where the nonparticipating manufacturer has established the qualified escrow fund required under W.S.

9-4-1202

(a)(ii), the account number of the qualified escrow fund and subaccount number for the state, the amount the nonparticipating manufacturer placed in the fund for cigarettes sold in the state during the preceding calendar year, the date and amount of each deposit and evidence or verification as may be deemed necessary by the attorney general to confirm the deposit and the amount and date of any withdrawal or transfer of funds the nonparticipating manufacturer made at any time from the fund or from any other qualified escrow fund into which it ever made escrow payments pursuant to W.S. 9-4-1202.

A tobacco product manufacturer shall not include a brand family in its certification unless:

In the case of a participating manufacturer, the participating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be deemed to be its cigarettes for the purpose of calculating payments under the master settlement agreement for the relevant year, in the volume and shares determined pursuant to the master settlement agreement; or

In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, the nonparticipating manufacturer affirms that the brand family is to be deemed to be its cigarettes for purposes of W.S.

9-4-1202

.

Nothing in this section shall be construed as limiting or otherwise affecting the state’s right to maintain that a brand family constitutes cigarettes of a different tobacco product manufacturer for purposes of calculating payments under the master settlement agreement or for purposes of this act and W.S.

9-4-1202

.

The tobacco product manufacturer shall maintain all invoices and documentation of sales and other information relied upon for the certifications required under this section for a period of five (5) years, unless otherwise required by law to maintain the information for a longer period of time.

The attorney general shall develop and make available for public inspection a directory listing all tobacco product manufacturers that have provided current and accurate certifications conforming to the requirements of this section and all brand families that are listed in the certifications, except as follows:

The attorney general shall not include or retain in the directory the name or brand families of any nonparticipating manufacturer who fails to provide the required certification or whose certification the attorney general determines is not in compliance with subsection (c) of this section and W.S.

9-4-1206

, unless the attorney general has determined that the violation has been cured to his satisfaction;

Neither a tobacco product manufacturer nor a brand family shall be included or retained in the directory if the attorney general concludes that:

In the case of a nonparticipating manufacturer, all escrow payments required pursuant to W.S.

9-4-1202

for any period for any brand family, whether or not listed by the nonparticipating manufacturer, have not been fully paid into a qualified escrow fund governed by a qualified escrow agreement that has been approved by the attorney general; or

All outstanding final judgments, including interest thereon, for violations of W.S.

9-4-1202

have not been fully satisfied for the brand family and the manufacturer.

The attorney general shall update the directory required under subsection (g) of this section as necessary to correct mistakes and to add or remove a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family to keep the directory in conformity with the requirements of this act. A determination by the attorney general to remove from the directory, or not to list on the directory, a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family shall be subject to review as provided by the Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act.

Every licensed wholesaler shall provide and update as necessary a current address to the attorney general for the purpose of receiving any notifications that may be required under this act.

No person shall affix a stamp to a package or other container of cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory required under subsection (g) of this section, or sell, offer for sale or possess for sale in this state, cigarettes of a tobacco product manufacturer or brand family not included in the directory.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 1.

Wyoming Administrative Procedure Act. —

See § 16-3-101(a), (b)(xi).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-1210(a)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 4, provides: “To the extent the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

, as created by section 1 of this act, and the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

conflict, the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

shall control. If any provision created by section 1 of this act causes W.S. 9-4-1201 and 9-4-1202 to fail as a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers, then that portion of this act shall not be valid.”

§ 9-4-1206.
Agent for service of process.

Any nonresident or foreign nonparticipating manufacturer who has not registered to do business in the state as a foreign corporation or business entity shall, as a condition precedent to having its brand families listed or retained in the directory required under W.S. 9-4-1205(g), appoint and continually engage without interruption the services of an agent in this state to act as agent for service of process on whom all process, and any action or proceeding against it concerning or arising out of the enforcement of this act and W.S.

9-4-1202

, may be served in any manner authorized by law. The service shall constitute legal and valid service of process on the nonparticipating manufacturer. The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide the name, address, phone number and proof of appointment and availability of the agent to the satisfaction of the attorney general.

The nonparticipating manufacturer shall provide notice to the attorney general thirty (30) calendar days prior to the termination of the authority of an agent appointed under this section and shall further provide proof to the satisfaction of the attorney general of the appointment of a new agent no less than five (5) calendar days prior to the termination of an existing agent appointment. In the event an agent terminates an agency appointment, the nonparticipating manufacturer shall notify the attorney general of the termination within five (5) calendar days and shall include proof to the satisfaction of the attorney general of the appointment of a new agent.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 1.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 4, provides: “To the extent the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

, as created by section 1 of this act, and the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

conflict, the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

shall control. If any provision created by section 1 of this act causes W.S. 9-4-1201 and 9-4-1202 to fail as a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers, then that portion of this act shall not be valid.”

§ 9-4-1207.
Reporting of information; escrow installments.

No later than twenty (20) days after the end of a calendar quarter, and more frequently if directed by the attorney general, each licensed wholesaler shall submit information the attorney general requires to facilitate compliance with this act, including, but not limited to, a list by brand family of the total number of cigarettes or in the case of roll your own cigarettes, the equivalent stick count for which the licensed wholesaler affixed stamps during the previous calendar quarter or otherwise paid the tax due for the cigarettes. The licensed wholesaler shall maintain and make available to the attorney general all invoices and documentation of sales of all nonparticipating manufacturer cigarettes and any other information relied upon in reporting to the attorney general for a period of five (5) years.

The department is authorized to disclose to the attorney general any information received under this act and requested by the attorney general for purposes of determining compliance with and enforcing the provisions of this act, implementing the master settlement agreement as defined in W.S. 9-4-1201(a)(v) or resolving any dispute arising under the master settlement agreement. The director of the department and the attorney general shall share the information received under this act and may share the information with other federal, state or local agencies or with a data clearinghouse or any similar entity or process established under the master settlement agreement or a settlement of any dispute arising under that agreement, only for the purposes of enforcement of this act, W.S.

9-4-1202

, enforcement of corresponding laws of other states or implementation of the master settlement agreement or a settlement of any dispute arising under that agreement.

The attorney general may require at any time from the nonparticipating manufacturer, proof from the financial institution in which the manufacturer has established a qualified escrow fund for the purpose of compliance with W.S.

9-4-1202

of the amount of money in the fund being held on behalf of the state, the dates of deposits and listing the amounts of all withdrawals from the account and the dates of the withdrawals.

In addition to the information required to be submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, the attorney general may require a licensed wholesaler or tobacco product manufacturer to submit any additional information including, but not limited to, samples of the packaging or labeling of each family brand as is necessary to enable the attorney general to determine whether a tobacco product manufacturer is in compliance with this act.

To promote compliance with this act, the attorney general may promulgate rules and regulations requiring a tobacco product manufacturer subject to the requirements of W.S. 9-4-1205(c) to make the escrow deposits required in installments during the year in which the sales covered by the deposits are made. The attorney general may require production of information sufficient to enable the attorney general to determine the adequacy of the amount of the installment deposit.

History.

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 1; 2017 ch. 123, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

, effective July 1, 2017, in (b), added “implementing the master settlement agreement as defined in W.S. 9-4-1201(a)(v) or resolving any dispute arising under the master settlement agreement” to the first sentence; added “or with a data clearinghouse or any similar entity or process established under the master settlement agreement or a settlement of any dispute arising under that agreement” to the second sentence; and substituted “enforcement of corresponding laws of other states or implementation of the master settlement agreement or a settlement of any dispute arising under that agreement” for “or corresponding laws of other states” at the end.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 9-4-1210(a)(xi).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2003, ch. 150, § 4, provides: “To the extent the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1205

through

9-4-1210

, as created by section 1 of this act, and the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

conflict, the provisions of W.S.

9-4-1201

and

9-4-1202

shall control. If any provision created by section 1 of this act causes W.S. 9-4-1201 and 9-4-1202 to fail as a qualifying or model statute, as those terms are defined in the master settlement agreement entered into on November 23, 1998, by the state and leading United States tobacco product manufacturers, then that portion of this act shall not be valid.”